Utah statutes.
67-5b-104.   Requirements of a memorandum of understanding.

(1)  Before a center may be established, a memorandum of understanding regarding participation in operation of the center shall be executed among:

(a)  the contracting public agency designated to oversee the operation and accountability of the center, including the budget, costs, personnel, and management pursuant to Title 51, Chapter 2a, Accounting Reports from Political Subdivisions, Interlocal Organizations, and Other Local Entities Act;

(b)  the Office of the Attorney General;

(c)  at least one representative of a county or municipal law enforcement agency that investigates child abuse in the area to be served by the center;

(d)  the division of Child and Family Services;

(e)  the county or district attorney who routinely prosecutes child abuse cases in the area to be served by the center; and

(f)  at least one representative of any other governmental entity that participates in child abuse investigations or offers services to child abuse victims that desires to participate in the operation of the center.

(2)  A memorandum of understanding executed under this section shall include the agreement of each participating entity to cooperate in:

(a)  developing a comprehensive and cooperative multidisciplinary team approach to investigating child abuse;

(b)  reducing, to the greatest extent possible, the number of interviews required of a victim of child abuse to minimize the negative impact of the investigation on the child; and

(c)  developing, maintaining, and supporting, through the center, an environment that emphasizes the best interests of children.

